dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
    <pardef n="ż/inġla__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>inġla</l><r>inġla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nieġel</l><r>inġla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bir/ra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ra</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>er</l><r>ra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ardal__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ardal</l><r>ardal<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>radal</l><r>ardal<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/enb__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>enb</l><r>enb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nub</l><r>enb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/awl__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>awl</l><r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiel</l><r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/enek__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>enek</l><r>enek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niek</l><r>enek<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/artalla__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>artalla</l><r>artalla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ratal</l><r>artalla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ratel</l><r>artalla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rietel</l><r>artalla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/rux__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>rux</l><r>rux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>orox</l><r>rux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/odon__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>odon</l><r>odon<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dan</l><r>odon<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="t/ebgħa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ebgħa</l><r>ebgħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bajja'</l><r>ebgħa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ejda__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ejda</l><r>ejda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wejjed</l><r>ejda<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/urbell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urbell</l><r>urbell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riebel</l><r>urbell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/iemel__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iemel</l><r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wiemel</l><r>iemel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="blok/ka__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>ka</l><r>ka<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ok</l><r>ka<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/omma__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>omma</l><r>omma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>miem</l><r>omma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="p/erpura__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>erpura</l><r>erpura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rapar</l><r>erpura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieper</l><r>erpura<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sħ/un__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>un</l><r>un<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>an</l><r>un<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/armel__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>armel</l><r>armel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>romol</l><r>armel<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ż/elluma__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>elluma</l><r>elluma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lielem</l><r>elluma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fe/rfux__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>rfux</l><r>rfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>friex</l><r>rfux<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="boċ/ċa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ċa</l><r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oċ</l><r>ċa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sp/iża__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iża</l><r>iża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjeż</l><r>iża<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħm/ar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ar</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ir</l><r>ar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ke/wkba__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>wkba</l><r>wkba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kwieb</l><r>wkba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/alib__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>alib</l><r>alib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>laleb</l><r>alib<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="kar/kur__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>kur</l><r>kur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kra</l><r>kur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/astun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>astun</l><r>astun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>saten</l><r>astun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="għer/q__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>q</l><r>q<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>uq</l><r>q<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/ifajk__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ifajk</l><r>ifajk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>jafek</l><r>ifajk<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/itla__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>itla</l><r>itla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tieli</l><r>itla<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/enter__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>enter</l><r>enter<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nieter</l><r>enter<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/ellus__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ellus</l><r>ellus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lieles</l><r>ellus<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="gż/ira__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ira</l><r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjer</l><r>ira<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/eritta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>eritta</l><r>eritta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rieret</l><r>eritta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bh/ima__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r>ima<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjem</l><r>ima<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/ekkum__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ekkum</l><r>ekkum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>kiekem</l><r>ekkum<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/arpun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arpun</l><r>arpun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rapen</l><r>arpun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riepen</l><r>arpun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/alvaġġ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>alvaġġ</l><r>alvaġġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>lavaġ</l><r>alvaġġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/abba__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>abba</l><r>abba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>bub</l><r>abba<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="perpura"><i>p</i><par n="p/erpura__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skwerra"><i>skwer</i><par n="bir/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="boċċa"><i>boċ</i><par n="boċ/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="spiża"><i>sp</i><par n="sp/iża__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bastun"><i>b</i><par n="b/astun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xifajk"><i>x</i><par n="x/ifajk__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="armel"><i></i><par n="/armel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="blokka"><i>blok</i><par n="blok/ka__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="karkur"><i>kar</i><par n="kar/kur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fardal"><i>f</i><par n="f/ardal__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="serra"><i>ser</i><par n="bir/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ferfux"><i>fe</i><par n="fe/rfux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="komma"><i>k</i><par n="k/omma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="senter"><i>s</i><par n="s/enter__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħabba"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/abba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qawl"><i>q</i><par n="q/awl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gwerra"><i>gwer</i><par n="bir/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="birra"><i>bir</i><par n="bir/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħodon"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/odon__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bhima"><i>bh</i><par n="bh/ima__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sħun"><i>sħ</i><par n="sħ/un__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mejda"><i>m</i><par n="m/ejda__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="beritta"><i>b</i><par n="b/eritta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żiemel"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/iemel__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġenb"><i>ġ</i><par n="d/enb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="bekkum"><i>b</i><par n="b/ekkum__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fellus"><i>f</i><par n="f/ellus__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="għerq"><i>għer</i><par n="għer/q__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qartalla"><i>q</i><par n="q/artalla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħmar"><i>ħm</i><par n="ħm/ar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="salib"><i>s</i><par n="s/alib__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="doċċa"><i>doċ</i><par n="boċ/ċa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kitla"><i>k</i><par n="k/itla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="trux"><i>t</i><par n="t/rux__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tebgħa"><i>t</i><par n="t/ebgħa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gżira"><i>gż</i><par n="gż/ira__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gurbell"><i>g</i><par n="g/urbell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kewkba"><i>ke</i><par n="ke/wkba__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħarpun"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/arpun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="salvaġġ"><i>s</i><par n="s/alvaġġ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="terra"><i>ter</i><par n="bir/ra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="denb"><i>d</i><par n="d/enb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żinġla"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/inġla__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fenek"><i>f</i><par n="f/enek__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="żelluma"><i>ż</i><par n="ż/elluma__n_GD"/></e>
